Wyoming, session 2026, HB0055.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
(i) Wyoming faces housing supply constraints
that burden working families and impair economic growth;

(ii) The state holds nontrust, state-acquired
real property that is not necessary to an essential
governmental purpose;

(iii) Disposal of the nonessential real property
at nominal consideration to owner-occupant purchasers,
subject to strict covenants, clustering and reversion, will
promote broad-based homeownership while preventing
acquisition by business entities and large-scale
speculative buyers.

(b) It is the purpose of this act to create
owner-occupied homestead communities on eligible state
lands and to ensure the land is used for single-family
residential purposes. This act constitutes a valid public
purpose, of primary benefit to all citizens of the state of
Wyoming.

Section 2. W.S. 36-9-201 through 36-9-213 are created
to read:
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325

ARTICLE 2
WYOMING HOMESTEAD OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM

36-9-201. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the
"Wyoming Homestead Opportunity Program."

36-9-202. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Eligible parcel" means state lands that are
not excluded under this paragraph, that are determined by
the board to be surplus lands that are unnecessary for
state needs and that are suitable for single family
residential use. "Eligible parcel" shall not include school
lands, institutional lands, all lands that are subject to
article 18, section 1 of the Wyoming constitution, lands
which have been reserved in any way to the public use, any
lands designated as a state park, campground, recreational
ground, historic landmark, historical site, state
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
archaeological site, wildlife refuge, wilderness area and
any other lands that the state is required to hold by law;

(ii) "Eligible purchaser" means a natural person
who is a citizen of the United States and who is domiciled
in Wyoming for not less than twelve (12) consecutive months
immediately prior to application under this article;

(iii) "Homestead cluster" or "cluster" means a
contiguous, planned offering of lots created under this
article with internal access and services planned at a
community scale;

(vi) "Lot" means a tract of ten (10) acres of an
eligible parcel that is designated by the office of state
lands and investments as available for disposal under this
article. "Lot" shall include only the surface estate and
shall not include any mineral rights.

36-9-203. Program administration.

(a) The office of state lands and investments shall
identify possible eligible parcels to the board. The board
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
shall review possible eligible parcels and may designate
parcels as eligible parcels under this article. The office
shall use parcels that are designated as eligible parcels
by the board to develop offerings of homestead clusters as
provided in this section.

(b) The office of state lands and investments shall
endeavor to establish a total of not less than ten (10) and
not more than twenty (20) homestead clusters in the state
from eligible parcels identified by the board. Each cluster
shall contain not less than three hundred (300) and not
more than one thousand (1,000) lots, as site conditions
allow and subject to local compliance under W.S. 36-9-210.

(c) Within each cluster, lots shall be platted and
offered as ten (10) acre tracts.

(d) The office of state lands and investments shall
conduct surveys, conduct environmental and cultural
resource reviews, develop access easements and create
internal roads and minor improvements as necessary to
create lots and clusters under this section.

HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
(e) The office of state lands and investments shall
seek local land use approvals and comply with local zoning
requirements as necessary to provide offerings of homestead
clusters under this section. The office shall coordinate
with counties and municipalities as necessary to
accommodate ingress, egress and emergency services.

(f) Lots and clusters shall be platted by the office
to preserve legal access and to avoid flood hazard areas
where practicable.

36-9-204. Disposition of lots; applications.

(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 36-9-101 through 36-9-120,
the board shall dispose of lots offered for disposal under
this article by warranty deed at a price of one dollar
($1.00) per acre. No disposal of lots under this article
shall include any mineral rights. The buyer shall also be
responsible for all actual recording and closing costs.

(b) The board shall establish a procedure that is
random and without favor to determine how lots are
allocated and disposed under this article. The procedure
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
under this subsection shall be adopted by rule and may be
by public drawing or lottery. The procedure for allocation
of lots shall not involve discretionary selection among
eligible applicants.

(c) Applications shall be accepted from eligible
purchasers meeting the criteria of this article. The
department shall verify eligibility only for compliance
with the requirements of this article and shall not include
any additional requirements for eligibility.

36-9-205. Eligibility; acreage cap; business entities
prohibited.

(a) Only eligible purchasers shall acquire lots under
this article.

(b) An eligible purchaser shall not acquire, directly
or indirectly, more than twenty-five (25) acres under this
article statewide, including all acquisitions over time.

(c) No business entity shall be an eligible purchaser
or take title to any lot under this article and no lot
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
acquired under this article shall be conveyed at any time
to any business entity. Any transfer to a business entity
in violation of this subsection is voidable at the option
of the state and subject to reversion under W.S. 36-9-209.

(d) No eligible purchaser shall assign the lot or any
right to purchase the lot prior to the initial purchase of
the lot.

36-9-206. Covenants required.

(a) Each deed for a lot under this article shall
include covenants running with the land in perpetuity
providing the following:

(i) The lot shall be used exclusively for
single-family detached residential purposes, which may
include customary accessory structures and agricultural and
recreational uses incidental to residential use;

(ii) The following uses shall be prohibited:

(A) Commercial or industrial use;
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325

(B) Multi-family residential use, including
use as a duplex, triplex, apartment, condominium or
townhouse;

(C) Any planned unit developments or
similar arrangements that would allow more than one (1)
single-family dwelling unit on a lot;

(D) Any accessory dwelling unit intended
for separate residential occupancy;

(E) Additional short-term or long-term
rental units, provided that this subparagraph shall not
prohibit rental of the single-family dwelling; and

(F) Any use that would increase residential
density above one (1) single-family dwelling unit per lot.

(iii) The lot shall never be subdivided or
replatted, and no boundary line adjustment shall be
permitted except to correct a documented survey error that
does not reduce any lot below its original acreage and does
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
not increase any owner's cumulative acreage above
twenty-five (25) acres;

(iv) The eligible purchaser shall maintain or
obtain a zoning classification, where applicable, that
permits single-family detached residential use and shall
not seek or consent to rezoning or other entitlements that
would permit multi-family, townhouse, condominium or any
higher-density residential or nonresidential zoning
classification;

(v) That any private covenants, homeowners'
association documents or similar instruments recorded by
the state or the eligible purchaser shall be consistent
with and shall not diminish the restrictions of this
section.

36-9-207. Construction and owner occupancy
requirements.

(a) The eligible purchaser shall obtain a certificate
of occupancy or equivalent local approval for a
single-family dwelling on the lot and shall begin occupancy
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
of the dwelling as the purchaser's primary residence not
later than twenty (20) years after closing on the lot.

(b) The purchaser shall occupy the dwelling as the
purchaser's primary residence for not less than five (5)
consecutive years after initial occupancy under subsection
(a) of this section.

36-9-208. Transfers of lots.

(a) For five (5) years after issuance of a
certificate of occupancy under W.S. 36-9-207(a), the lot
shall only be conveyed to another eligible purchaser, and
the conveyance shall include all covenants required by this
article.

(b) Prior to the recording of any conveyance under
subsection (a) of this section, the eligible purchaser
shall execute an affidavit attesting that the conveyance
will not cause the purchaser's cumulative acreage under
this article to exceed twenty-five (25) acres and that
title will not be held by or conveyed to a business entity.

HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
(c) The office of state lands and investments or the
board shall not exercise discretionary approval or denial
of proposed transfers under this section where all
conditions for the transfer established under this article
are met.

(d) Recording a transfer that does not conform with
the requirements of this section constitutes a violation
enforceable under W.S. 36-9-209.

36-9-209. Reversion of lots; remedies.

(a) If an owner of a lot violates any covenants under
W.S. 36-9-206(a) or fails to meet the requirements of W.S.
36-9-207(a), title to the lot shall automatically revert to
the state upon the board recording a notice of reversion
not earlier than sixty (60) days after providing written
notice and opportunity to cure.

(b) If an owner of a lot violates W.S. 36-9-205(b) or
(c), 36-9-207(b) or 36-9-208, title to the lot is voidable
at the option of the board and the title shall revert upon
the board recording a notice of reversion following notice
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
and opportunity to cure as provided in subsection (a) of
this section.

(c) If title to a lot is reverted to the state under
subsection (a) or (b) of this section, the office of state
lands and investments shall refund to the eligible
purchaser an amount equal to the original purchase price
paid for the lot plus any recording or closing costs paid
by the purchaser. No compensation shall be due under this
subsection for any improvements to the lot or for
consequential damages.

(d) The attorney general may bring an action for
injunctive relief, specific performance, quiet title or
damages, and may record notices of violations of this
article to preserve the state's interests. Adjoining owners
of lots in a homestead cluster created under this article
shall have standing to seek injunctive relief to enforce
this article.

36-9-210. Local compliance; exclusion of state
obligation.

HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
(a) Eligible purchasers of lots shall comply with all
applicable county and municipal building, sanitation,
water, wastewater, road and fire codes.

(b) Nothing in this article shall obligate the state
to provide or extend utilities to lots. The board may, by
rule, establish minimum access and sanitation standards for
any lots or clusters offered under this article.

36-9-211. Rulemaking.

(a) The board shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement this article, including cluster designation,
planning and siting, allocation procedures, eligibility
verification and standard forms of deed covenants and
reversion notices.

(b) To the extent necessary to carry out the purposes
of this act, the board may, by rule, modify operational
terms of the program under this article, including but not
limited to:

HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
(i) The number, size and phasing of homestead
clusters;

(ii) Application windows, impartial allocation
procedures and administrative procedures;

(iii) Construction milestone timelines, cure
periods and documentation standards;

(iv) Survey, access, sanitation and platting
standards and requirements necessary for orderly
development of clusters.

(c) Rules adopted under subsection (b) of this
section shall not:

(i) Permit ownership of lots or clusters by
business entities;

(ii) Authorize any subdivision, replatting or
boundary adjustment that violates W.S. 36-9-206(a)(ii);

HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
(iii) Permit any use other than single-family
detached residential property use;

(iv) Waive or increase the acreage cap provided
in W.S. 36-9-205(b);

(v) Eliminate the allocation procedure
requirements of W.S. 36-9-204(b);

(vi) Eliminate the reversion remedies specified
in W.S. 36-9-209.

(d) Any rules adopted under subsection (b) of this
section that modify any operational terms of this article
shall state the specific factual conditions necessitating
the modification and shall explain how the modification
advances the purposes of this act.

36-9-212. No impairment of trust obligations.

No lands held in trust for any beneficiary shall be
conveyed under this article unless separately authorized by
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
law and shall only be conveyed consistent with
constitutional, statutory and fiduciary obligations.

36-9-213. Reporting.

The department shall report not later than October 1 of
each year to the joint agriculture, state and public lands
and water resources interim committee on all activities
under this article, including any clusters established,
lots offered, applications received, sales completed,
reversions recorded and any enforcement actions.

Section 3. W.S. 36-1-101(a)(viii) and 36-9-102 are
amended to read:

36-1-101. Definitions.

(a) Unless the context indicates otherwise, as used
in this act:

(viii) "This act" means W.S. 36-1-101 through
36-3-111, 36-5-101 through 36-7-510 and 36-9-101 through
36-9-121 36-9-213.
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325

36-9-102. Manner of sale; minimum price.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, all state lands shall be disposed of only at
public auction to the highest responsible bidder after
having been duly appraised by the board, and shall be sold
at not less than the appraised value thereof, and for not
less than ten dollars ($10.00) per acre.

(b) The provisions of W.S. 36-9-101 through 36-9-120
shall not apply to the disposal of lands under the Wyoming
Homestead Opportunity Program.

Section 4. There is appropriated two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the
office of state lands and investments for purposes of a
study on the administration and enforcement of the Wyoming
Homestead Opportunity Program as created by section 1 of
this act. The study may include activities necessary to
begin administering the program including surveying and
conducting other activities for determining lots and
homestead clusters. This appropriation shall be for the
HB0055

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0325
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.

Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0055